Hawaii statutes.
§212-5 Setting aside public lands; lease,
license, and permits. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
governor may set aside public lands to a public corporation for the purpose of
this chapter and the corporation may, by negotiation and without recourse to
public auction, lease, rent, or let the lands or any part thereof or any
interest therein, including concessions and concession space, by lease,
license, or permit on the terms and conditions set by the corporation. [L 1963,
c 7, §6; Supp, §98T-6; HRS §212-5]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next